Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-162.01
Banks; trust department; conduct of business; location.

Any bank authorized to transact a trust company business in a trust department pursuant to sections 8-159 to 8-162 may conduct such trust company business at the office of any bank which is a subsidiary of the same bank holding company as the authorized bank.

Laws 1993, LB 81, § 13.